Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,213
Snowmobiles; state or political subdivision; fee waived.

A registration number shall be issued without the payment of a fee for snowmobiles owned by the state or a political subdivision thereof upon application therefor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 213.